Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 5

Appropriations to Safety Councils

7-51-501. Appropriations to safety councils.

Any county or municipality in this state may make appropriations from its general revenues for the purpose of aiding the work of any local county or city safety council, located in such county or city, which local council has been approved by the Tennessee safety council.

Acts 1951, ch. 221, § 1 (Williams, § 844.5); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-605.